Utah statutes.
26-35a-108.   Intermediate care facility for people with an intellectual disability -- Uniform rate.

An intermediate care facility for people with an intellectual disability is subject to all the provisions of this chapter, except that the department shall establish a uniform rate for an intermediate care facility for people with an intellectual disability that:

(1)  is based on the same formula specified for nursing care facilities under the provisions of Subsection 26-35a-104(1)(b); and

(2)  may be different than the uniform rate established for other nursing care facilities.

